Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4738.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.43a Pub saf E Aiming a beam of directed energy emitted from a directed energy device at or into path of aircraft or a moving train 5 750.45a(1) Pub saf F Using an unmanned aircraft in a manner that interferes with certain facilities 4 750.45a(2) Pub saf F Flying over or causing an unmanned aircraft to hover over facility designated on federal registry 4 750.49(2)(a) to (d) Pub ord F Fighting animals or providing facilities for animal fights 4 750.49(2)(e) Pub ord F Organizing or promoting animal fights 4 750.49(2)(f) Pub ord H Attending animal fight 4 750.49(2)(g) Pub ord F Breeding or selling fighting animals 4 750.49(2)(h) Pub ord F Selling or possessing equipment for animal fights 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.49(8) Person A Inciting fighting animal resulting in death Life 750.49(9) Person F Inciting fighting animal to attack 4 750.49(10) Person D Fighting animal attacking without provocation and death resulting 15 750.50(4)(c) Pub ord G Animal neglect or cruelty involving 4 or more animals but fewer than 10 animals or with 1 prior conviction 2 750.50(4)(d) Pub ord F Animal neglect or cruelty involving 10 or more animals but fewer than 25 animals or with 2 prior convictions 4 750.50(4)(e) Pub ord E Animal neglect or cruelty involving 25 or more animals or with 3 or more prior convictions 7 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.50(4)(f) Pub ord G Animal neglect or cruelty by breeder or pet shop operator with 5 or more prior violations of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.331 to 287.340 2 750.50b(3) Property D First degree killing or torturing animals 10 750.50b(4) Property E Second degree killing or torturing animals 7 750.50b(5) Property F Third degree killing or torturing animals 4 750.50c(5) 750.50c(6) Pub ord E Killing or causing serious physical harm to law enforcement animal or search and rescue dog 5 750.50c(7) 750.50c(8) Pub saf H Harassing or causing harm to law enforcement animal or search and rescue dog while committing crime 2 750.50c(9) Pub saf H Killing or causing serious physical harm to law enforcement animal or search and rescue dog while committing a crime 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 750.68 Property G Changing brands with intent to steal 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4732 (request no. H00567'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.